District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.09

Exemption from military or jury duty, civil arrest or process.

No person holding office under this chapter shall be liable to military or jury duty, nor to arrest on civil process, nor to service of subpoenas from civil courts while actually on duty.

R.S., D.C., § 353
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
Military service, exemptions from, see § 49-402.
This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.
1981 Ed., § 4-124.
1973 Ed., § 4-128.